District of Columbia statutes.
21-2401.04

Communication between courts.

(a)

The Superior Court may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

(b)

Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 104 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.